Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-20,184
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Inspection of corporate records; rights.

(1) A shareholder's agent or attorney shall have the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder he or she represents.

(2) The right to copy records under section 21-20,183 shall include, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, or other means.

(3) The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

(4) The corporation may comply with a shareholder's demand to inspect the record of shareholders under subdivision (2)(c) of section 21-20,183 by providing him or her with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder's demand.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 184.